Alabama, session 2026rs, HB169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
15 Section 1. Sections 41-6-3 and 41-6-4, Code of Alabama
16 1975, are amended to read as follows:
17 "§41-6-3
18 (a) The department shall be under the control of the
19 Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History,
20 which shall consist of one member from each congressional
21 district and the additional members selected pursuant to
22 subsection (b)as the districts existed on January 1, 2025,
23 nine at-large members, and the Governor or his or her
24 designee.
25 (b) Two additional at-large members shall be selected
26 and an additional member shall be selected from each U.S.
27 Congressional District. The additional members shall be
28 selected by the board of trustees and their names shall be
Page 1

selected by the board of trustees and their names shall be
HB169 Engrossed
29 communicated to the Senate not later than the fifth
30 legislative day of the 2004 Regular Session of the
31 Legislature. Newly selected members shall be confirmed by the
32 Senate in the same manner as vacancies filled pursuant to
33 Section 41-6-4. The board of trustees shall select three of
34 the new members to serve initial terms of two years, three of
35 the new members to serve initial terms of four years, and
36 three of the new members to serve initial terms of six years.
37 All successor members shall serve terms of six years and shall
38 be selected as provided in Section 41-6-4.
39 (b) Each vacancy in an appointed board seat, as the
40 vacancy arises, whether by expiration of term of service or by
41 death, resignation, or removal shall be filled as follows:
42 (1) Seat 1, a resident of Congressional District 1, for
43 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2027, and every six
44 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
45 (2) Seat 2, a resident of Congressional District 2, for
46 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2029, and every six
47 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
48 (3) Seat 3, a resident of Congressional District 3, for
49 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2030, and every six
50 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
51 (4) Seat 4, a resident of Congressional District 4, for
52 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2026, and every six
53 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
54 (5) Seat 5, a resident of Congressional District 5, for
55 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2028, and every six
56 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
Page 2

years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
HB169 Engrossed
57 (6) Seat 6, a resident of Congressional District 6, for
58 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2028, and every six
59 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
60 (7) Seat 7, a resident of Congressional District 7, for
61 a six-year term commencing January 1, 2025, and every six
62 years thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
63 (8) Seat 8, a resident of the state at-large, for a
64 six-year term commencing January 1, 2031, and every six years
65 thereafter, appointed by the Governor.
66 (9) Seat 9, a resident of the state at-large, for a
67 six-year term commencing January 1, 2028, and every six years
68 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
69 Representatives from three nominees provided by the Minority
70 Leader of the House of Representatives.
71 (10) Seat 10, a resident of the state at-large, for a
72 six-year term commencing January 1, 2030, and every six years
73 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
74 Representatives.
75 (11) Seat 11, a resident of the state at-large, for a
76 six-year term commencing January 1, 2027, and every six years
77 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
78 Representatives.
79 (12) Seat 12, a resident of the state at-large, for a
80 six-year term commencing January 1, 2026, and every six years
81 thereafter, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
82 Representatives.
83 (13) Seat 13, a resident of the state at-large, for a
84 six-year term commencing January 1, 2031, and every six years
Page 3

six-year term commencing January 1, 2031, and every six years
HB169 Engrossed
85 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
86 Senate.
87 (14) Seat 14, a resident of the state at-large, for a
88 six-year term commencing January 1, 2027, and every six years
89 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
90 Senate.
91 (15) Seat 15, a resident of the state at-large, for a
92 six-year term commencing January 1, 2023, and every six years
93 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
94 Senate from three nominees provided by the Minority Leader of
95 the Senate.
96 (16) Seat 16, a resident of the state at-large, for a
97 six-year term commencing January 1, 2026, and every six years
98 thereafter, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
99 Senate.
100 (c) The membership of the board of trustees appointing
101 authorities shall be coordinate their appointments to assure
102 that the membership of the board is inclusive and shall
103 reflect reflects the racial and, gender, geographic, urban,
104 rural, and economic diversity of the state.
105 (d) Each appointed member shall serve at the pleasure
106 of his or her appointing authority."
107 "§41-6-4
108 (a) The board of trustees shall fill all vacancies
109 occurring on the board, whether by expiration of term of
110 service or by death or resignation, but the names of all
111 successor members shall be communicated to the current session
112 or the next ensuing regular session of the state Senate for
Page 4

or the next ensuing regular session of the state Senate for
HB169 Engrossed
113 confirmation. If the Senate rejects any successor trustee, the
114 board shall proceed forthwith to fill the vacancy.All
115 appointments made by the Governor shall be subject to
116 consideration by the Senate Committee on Confirmations as the
117 committee deems necessary. An appointee shall continue to
118 serve his or her term from the date of appointment unless and
119 until the Senate Committee on Confirmations elects to consider
120 the appointment and subsequently rejects the appointment. If
121 the Senate Committee on Confirmations rejects an appointment,
122 the Secretary of the Senate shall forward the rejection to the
123 Governor and request a new individual be appointed.
124 (b) A trustee An individual appointed to succeed a
125 member whose term has expired shall serve for a term of six
126 years. A person An individual appointed to fill a vacancy
127 occurring by death or, resignation, or removal shall only
128 serve out the unexpired term of his or her predecessor. A
129 person whose appointment to the board has been confirmed by
130 the Senate shall serve beyond his or her expired term until a
131 successor has been confirmed by the Senate.
132 (c) The board shall hold at the State Capital at least
133 one regular meeting during every year and as many special
134 meetings as may be necessary, and at any meeting. a A majority
135 of the trustees board members shall constitute a quorum. The
136 Governor of the state, or his or her designee, shall be a
137 voting member of the board as authorized by Section 41-6-3,
138 and he or she shall, as far as possible, shall lend every
139 encouragement to the success and upbuilding development of the
140 department. The director shall be the secretary of the board.
Page 5

department. The director shall be the secretary of the board.
HB169 Engrossed
141 The trustees Members of the board shall receive no
142 compensation for their services. Each member of the board of
143 trustees shall be reimbursed at the same per diem and travel
144 allowance amounts paid by law to state employees for each day
145 of attendance of the business of the board.
146 (d) The board may do all of the following:
147 (1) Adopt rules for its own government and also for the
148 government of the department.
149 (2) Elect a director and provide for the selection or
150 appointment of other officials or employees as may be
151 authorized.
152 (3) Provide for the publication of historical material
153 pertaining to the state under the supervision of the director.
154 (4) Control and expend such appropriations as may be
155 made for the maintenance of the department.
156 (5) Perform such other acts as may be necessary to
157 carry out the intent and purposes of this article."
158 Section 2. This act shall become effective October 1,
159 2026.
Page 6

2026.
HB169 Engrossed
160
161
162 House of Representatives
163 Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
164 to the House of Representatives
165 committee on State Government
166
167 Read for the second time and placed ................12-Feb-26
168 on the calendar:
169 1 amendment
170
171 Read for the third time and passed ................31-Mar-26
172 as amended
173 Yeas 61
174 Nays 35
175 Abs 6
176
177
178 John Treadwell
179 Clerk
180
Page 7